src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
!куземс:ку
LEXICON IV_KUZEMS
@U.TRANS.IV@:@U.TRANS.IV@ V_KUZEMS ;
@U.TRANS.IV@+Der+Der/OkshnOms+V:@U.TRANS.IV@зь%>%{оеэØ%}кшн V_NEKSHNEMS ;
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@+Der+Der/OvtOms+V:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@%>зевть V_NEVTEMS ;
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@+Der+Der/Ovtnjems+V:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@%>зевтне V_PIDEMS ;
@U.TRANS.IV@+Der+Der/OvOms+V:@U.TRANS.IV@%>%{оеэØ%}в V_SAEVEMS ;

LEXICON IV_LEDEMS
@U.TRANS.IV@:@U.TRANS.IV@ V_LEDEMS ;
@U.TRANS.IV@+Der+Der/OkshnOms+V:@U.TRANS.IV@%>%{оеэØ%}кшн V_NEKSHNEMS ;
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@+Der+Der/OvtOms+V:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@%>%{оеэØ%}вть V_NEVTEMS ;
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@+Der+Der/Ovtnjems+V:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@%>%{оеэØ%}втне V_PIDEMS ;
@U.TRANS.IV@+Der+Der/OvOms+V:@U.TRANS.IV@%>%{оеэØ%}в V_SAEVEMS ;

!LEXICON IV_LEDEMS-SG3
!@U.TRANS.IV@ V_LEDEMS-SG3 ;

LEXICON IV_SAVTOMS_SUB
+Use/NG+Err/Orth: IV_SAVTOMS ;
LEXICON IV_SAVTOMS
@U.TRANS.IV@:@U.TRANS.IV@ V_SAVTOMS ;
@U.TRANS.IV@+Der+Der/OkshnOms+V:@U.TRANS.IV@%>%{оеэØ%}кшно V_KUNDAMS ;
@U.TRANS.IV@+Der+Der/njems+V:@U.TRANS.IV@%>не V_PIDEMS ;
@U.TRANS.IV@+Der+Der/OvOms+V:@U.TRANS.IV@%>%{оеэØ%}в V_JANGAVOMS ;

!LEXICON IV_SAVTOMS-SG3
!@U.TRANS.IV@ V_SAVTOMS-SG3 ;
!LEXICON IV_SAVTOMS-SG3_SUBJ/ZERO
!+Subj/Zero: V_SAVTOMS-SG3 ;
!+Subj/Zero:  Deverbals-kadoms ;

LEXICON IV_CHACHTOMS
@U.TRANS.IV@:@U.TRANS.IV@ V_CHACHTOMS ;
@U.TRANS.IV@+Der+Der/OkshnOms+V:@U.TRANS.IV@%>%{оеэØ%}кшно V_KUNDAMS ;
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@+Der+Der/OvtOms+V:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@%>%{оеэØ%}вт V_SAVTOMS ;
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@+Der+Der/Ovtnjems+V:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@%>%{оеэØ%}втне V_PIDEMS ;
@U.TRANS.IV@+Der+Der/OvOms+V:@U.TRANS.IV@%>%{оеэØ%}в V_JANGAVOMS ;

LEXICON IV_NEVTEMS_SUB
+Use/NG+Err/Orth: IV_NEVTEMS ;
LEXICON IV_NEVTEMS
@U.TRANS.IV@:@U.TRANS.IV@ V_NEVTEMS ;
@U.TRANS.IV@+Der+Der/OkshnOms+V:@U.TRANS.IV@%>%{оеэØ%}кшн V_NEKSHNEMS ;
@U.TRANS.IV@+Der+Der/OvOms+V:@U.TRANS.IV@%>%{оеэØ%}в V_SAEVEMS ;

LEXICON IV_KADOMS
@U.TRANS.IV@:@U.TRANS.IV@ V_KADOMS ;
@U.TRANS.IV@+Der+Der/OkshnOms:@U.TRANS.IV@%>%{оеэØ%}кшно IV_KUNDAKSHNOMS ;
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@+Der+Der/OvtOms+V:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@%>%{оеэØ%}вт V_SAVTOMS ;
@U.TRANS.IV@+Der+Der/OvOms+V:@U.TRANS.IV@%>%{оеэØ%}в V_JANGAVOMS ;

LEXICON IV_SAEVEMS_SUB
+Use/NG+Err/Orth: IV_SAEVEMS ;
LEXICON IV_SAEVEMS
@U.TRANS.IV@:@U.TRANS.IV@ V_SAEVEMS ;
@U.TRANS.IV@+Der+Der/OkshnOms+V:@U.TRANS.IV@%>%{оеэØ%}кшн V_NEKSHNEMS ;
@U.TRANS.IV@+Der+Der/OkshnOms+V:@U.TRANS.IV@%>кшн V_NEKSHNEMS ;

LEXICON IV_POTAZEVEMS
@U.TRANS.IV@:@U.TRANS.IV@ V_SAEVEMS ;
@U.TRANS.IV@+Der+Der/OkshnOms+V:@U.TRANS.IV@%>кшн V_NEKSHNEMS ;
@U.TRANS.IV@+Der+Der/OkshnOms+V:@U.TRANS.IV@%>%{оеэØ%}кшн V_NEKSHNEMS ;

LEXICON IV_JANGAVOMS
@U.TRANS.IV@:@U.TRANS.IV@ V_JANGAVOMS ;
@U.TRANS.IV@+Der+Der/OkshnOms+V:@U.TRANS.IV@%>%{оеэØ%}кшно V_KUNDAMS ;
@U.TRANS.IV@+Der+Der/OkshnOms+V:@U.TRANS.IV@%>кшно V_KUNDAMS ;

LEXICON IV_KUNDAMS_SUB
+Use/NG+Err/Orth: IV_KUNDAMS ;
LEXICON IV_KUNDAMS
@U.TRANS.IV@:@U.TRANS.IV@ V_KUNDAMS ;
@U.TRANS.IV@+Der+Der/OkshnOms+V:@U.TRANS.IV@кшно IV_KUNDAKSHNOMS ;
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@+Der+Der/OvtOms+V:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@%>%{оеэØ%}вт V_SAVTOMS ;
@U.TRANS.IV@+Der+Der/OvOms+V:@U.TRANS.IV@%>%{оеэØ%}в V_JANGAVOMS ;

LEXICON IV_PIDEMS
@U.TRANS.IV@:@U.TRANS.IV@ V_PIDEMS ;
@U.TRANS.IV@+Der+Der/OkshnOms+V:@U.TRANS.IV@кшн IV_NEKSHNEMS ;
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@+Der+Der/OvtOms+V:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@%>вть V_SAVTOMS ;
@U.TRANS.IV@+Der+Der/OvOms+V:@U.TRANS.IV@%>в V_JANGAVOMS ;

LEXICON IV_E2ZHNEMS
@U.TRANS.IV@:@U.TRANS.IV@ V_PIDEMS ;
@U.TRANS.IV@+Der+Der/OkshnOms+V:@U.TRANS.IV@кшн IV_NEKSHNEMS ;
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@+Der+Der/OvtOms+V:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@%>вть V_SAVTOMS ;
@U.TRANS.IV@+Der+Der/OvOms+V:@U.TRANS.IV@%>в V_JANGAVOMS ;

LEXICON IV_KUNDAKSHNOMS
@U.TRANS.IV@:@U.TRANS.IV@ V_KUNDAMS ;

LEXICON IV_SATOMS
@U.TRANS.IV@:@U.TRANS.IV@ V_SATOMS ;
@U.TRANS.IV@+Der+Der/OkshnOms+V:@U.TRANS.IV@%>%{оеэØ%}кшно V_KUNDAMS ;

LEXICON IV_LETEMS
 IV_SATOMS ;
@U.TRANS.IV@+Der+Der/OkshnOms+V:@U.TRANS.IV@%>%{оеэØ%}кшн V_NEKSHNEMS ;

!! # AUXILIARY VERBS
!LEXICON VA_SAVTOMS
!+V+Aux: V_SAVTOMS ;
!@U.TRANS.IV@+V+Aux+Der+Der/OkshnOms+V:@U.TRANS.IV@%>%{оеэØ%}кшно V_KUNDAMS ;

!LEXICON VA_JANGAVOMS
!+V+Aux: V_JANGAVOMS ;
!@U.TRANS.IV@!+V+Aux+Der+Der/OkshnOms+V:@U.TRANS.IV@%>%{оеэØ%}кшно V_KUNDAMS ;

!LEXICON VA_JANGAVOMS-SG3
!+V+Aux: V_JANGAVOMS-SG3 ;

!LEXICON VA_LETEMS
!+V+Aux: V_SATOMS ;
!@U.TRANS.IV@!+V+Aux+Der+Der/OkshnOms+V:@U.TRANS.IV@%>%{оеэØ%}кшн V_NEKSHNEMS ;

!LEXICON VA_LETEMS-SG3
!+V+Aux: V_SATOMS-SG3 ;

LEXICON VA_KUNDAMS
+Aux: V_KUNDAMS ;
@U.TRANS.IV@+V+Aux+Der+Der/OkshnOms+V:@U.TRANS.IV@%>%{оеэØ%}кшно V_KUNDAMS ;


!! # DERIVATION
LEXICON DERIVE-V2V-WITH-ONSET-VOWEL_FRONT
+Der+Der/OkshnOms+V:кшн V_NEKSHNEMS ;
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@+Der+Der/OvtOms+V:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@%>вть V_NEVTEMS ;
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@P.TRANS.TV@+Der+Der/Ovtnjems+V:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@P.TRANS.TV@втне V_PIDEMS ;
@P.TRANS.IV@+Der+Der/OvOms+V:@P.TRANS.IV@в V_SAEVEMS ;
@P.TRANS.IV@+Der+Der/OvkshnOms+V:@P.TRANS.IV@вкшн V_NEKSHNEMS ;
@P.TRANS.IV@+Der+Der/Ozevems+V:@P.TRANS.IV@зев V_SAEVEMS ;
@P.TRANS.IV@+Der+Der/Ozevkshnems+V:@P.TRANS.IV@зевкшн V_NEKSHNEMS ;
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@P.TRANS.TV@+Der+Der/Ozevtems+V:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@P.TRANS.TV@зевть V_NEVTEMS ;
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@P.TRANS.TV@+Der+Der/Ozevtnjems+V:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@P.TRANS.TV@зевтне V_PIDEMS ;


LEXICON DERIVE-V2V-WITH-ONSET-VOWEL_BACK
+Der+Der/OkshnOms+V:кшно V_KUNDAMS ;
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@+Der+Der/OvtOms+V:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.TRANS.TV@%>вт V_SAVTOMS ;
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@P.TRANS.TV@+Der+Der/Ovtnjems+V:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@P.TRANS.TV@втне V_PIDEMS ;
@P.TRANS.IV@+Der+Der/OvOms+V:@P.TRANS.IV@в V_JANGAVOMS ;
@P.TRANS.IV@+Der+Der/OvkshnOms+V:@P.TRANS.IV@вкшно V_KUNDAMS ;
@P.TRANS.IV@+Der+Der/Ozevems+V:@P.TRANS.IV@зев V_SAEVEMS ;
@P.TRANS.IV@+Der+Der/Ozevkshnems+V:@P.TRANS.IV@зевкшн V_NEKSHNEMS ;
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@P.TRANS.TV@+Der+Der/Ozevtems+V:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@P.TRANS.TV@зевть V_NEVTEMS ;
@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@P.TRANS.TV@+Der+Der/Ozevtnjems+V:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@@P.TRANS.TV@зевтне V_PIDEMS ;

!LEXICON DERIVE-V2V-WITHOUT-ONSET-VOWEL



!! # VERBS AFTER TRANSITIVITY Tags OBJECT FLAGS 

LEXICON V_UEMS
 :й V_KADOMS ;
LEXICON V_UEMS-CONJUGATION
 :й V_KADOMS-CONJUGATION ;

LEXICON V_TUEMS
                 :й V_KADOMS ;
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ PredIndPrt1Sc3 ;
 IND_PRS_40 ;
 IND_PRS_50 ;

LEXICON V_TUEMS-CONJUGATION
    :й V_KADOMS-CONJUGATION ;

LEXICON V_TEEMS
!! теемс:тей
 V_KADOMS ;
!LEXICON V_TEEMS-CONJUGATION
!! теемс:тей
! V_KADOMS-CONJUGATION ;

LEXICON V_NEEMS
:й VerbsPresPrc_1 ;
:й Deverbals-kadoms ;
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@+Err/Orth:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@й IND_PRT1_ALL ;
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@+Err/Orth:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@й%>%{иы%} IND-PRT2-ALL ;!%>%{оеэØ%}
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@+Err/Orth-mid-linking-vowel-should-be-high+Err/Orth:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@й%>%{оеэØ%} IND-PRT2-ALL ;!%>%{оеэØ%}
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@+Err/Orth:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@й CONJUNCTIVE-ALL ;



!@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.IND@:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.IND@ IND_PRS_30/60 ;!2024-07-7
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ IND_PRS_30/60 ;!2024-07-14
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@й IND_PRS_10/20 ;!2024-07-07FIXME
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ IND_PRS_40/50 ;!2024-07-07
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@+Err/Orth:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@й IND_PRS_40/50 ;!2024-07-07
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@+Err/Orth:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@й V_NEEMS-a ;
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ V_NEEMS-a ;
!#start
!@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET1@:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.PRET1@ IndicativePretI-plus ;2024-07-14
@U.CONJ-TX.PRET1@:@U.CONJ-TX.PRET1@ IndicativePretI-plus ;
!@U.CONJ-MX.IND@ R_CONJ_PRS_OBJALL/13/16/23/26/33/36/43/46/53/56/63/66 ;2024-07-14
 R_CONJ_PRS_OBJALL/13/16/23/26/33/36/43/46/53/56/63/66 ;
+Use/NG:й R_CONJ_PRS_OBJALL/13/16/23/26/33/36/43/46/53/56/63/66 ;

!#end
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@+Err/Orth:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@й PredIndPrt1Sc3 ;
:й  CondVerbs ;

@U.CONJ-INF.NO@:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ IND_PRT1_ALL ;
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@%>%{иы%} IND-PRT2-ALL ;!%>%{оеэØ%}
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@+Err/Orth-mid-linking-vowel-should-be-high:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@%>%{оеэØ%} IND-PRT2-ALL ;!%>%{оеэØ%}
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ CONJUNCTIVE-ALL ;

@U.CONJ-INF.NO@:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ PredIndPrt1Sc3 ;


 @R.CONJ.ObjAll@  IND_PRS_Obj-in-S ; ! 2012-08-07 неса
 @R.CONJ-PX.13@ IND_PRS_Obj-in-S ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.16@ IND_PRS_Obj-in-S ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.23@ IND_PRS_Obj-in-S ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.26@ IND_PRS_Obj-in-S ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.33@ IND_PRS_Obj-in-S ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.36@ IND_PRS_Obj-in-S ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.43@ IND_PRS_Obj-in-S ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.46@ IND_PRS_Obj-in-S ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.53@ IND_PRS_Obj-in-S ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.56@ IND_PRS_Obj-in-S ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.63@ IND_PRS_Obj-in-S ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.66@ IND_PRS_Obj-in-S ;
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ PredIndPrt1Sc3 ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.12@ IND_PRS_Obj-TLoss ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.32@ IND_PRS_Obj-TLoss ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.15@ IND_PRS_Obj-TLoss ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.35@ IND_PRS_Obj-TLoss ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.42@ IND_PRS_Obj-TLoss ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.45@ IND_PRS_Obj-TLoss ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.62@ IND_PRS_Obj-TLoss ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.65@ IND_PRS_Obj-TLoss ;

!LEXICON V_NEEMS-CONJUGATION
!  :й V_KADOMS-CONJUGATION ;
! @R.CONJ.ObjAll@  IND_PRS_Obj-in-S ; ! 2012-08-07 неса
! @R.CONJ-PX.13@ IND_PRS_Obj-in-S ;
! @R.CONJ-PX.16@ IND_PRS_Obj-in-S ;
! @R.CONJ-PX.23@ IND_PRS_Obj-in-S ;
! @R.CONJ-PX.26@ IND_PRS_Obj-in-S ;
! @R.CONJ-PX.33@ IND_PRS_Obj-in-S ;
! @R.CONJ-PX.36@ IND_PRS_Obj-in-S ;
! @R.CONJ-PX.43@ IND_PRS_Obj-in-S ;
! @R.CONJ-PX.46@ IND_PRS_Obj-in-S ;
! @R.CONJ-PX.53@ IND_PRS_Obj-in-S ;
! @R.CONJ-PX.56@ IND_PRS_Obj-in-S ;
! @R.CONJ-PX.63@ IND_PRS_Obj-in-S ;
! @R.CONJ-PX.66@ IND_PRS_Obj-in-S ;
!@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ PredIndPrt1Sc3 ;


LEXICON V_MIEMS
:й V_KADOMS ;
@R.CONJ.ObjAll@  IND_PRS_Obj-in-S ; ! 2012-08-07 миса
 @R.CONJ-PX.13@ IND_PRS_Obj-in-S ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.16@ IND_PRS_Obj-in-S ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.23@ IND_PRS_Obj-in-S ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.26@ IND_PRS_Obj-in-S ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.33@ IND_PRS_Obj-in-S ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.36@ IND_PRS_Obj-in-S ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.43@ IND_PRS_Obj-in-S ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.46@ IND_PRS_Obj-in-S ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.53@ IND_PRS_Obj-in-S ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.56@ IND_PRS_Obj-in-S ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.63@ IND_PRS_Obj-in-S ;
 @R.CONJ-PX.66@ IND_PRS_Obj-in-S ;
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ PredIndPrt1Sc3 ;

!LEXICON V_MIEMS-CONJUGATION
!     :й V_KADOMS-CONJUGATION ;
!@R.CONJ.ObjAll@  IND_PRS_Obj-in-S ; ! 2012-08-07 миса
! @R.CONJ-PX.13@ IND_PRS_Obj-in-S ;
! @R.CONJ-PX.16@ IND_PRS_Obj-in-S ;
! @R.CONJ-PX.23@ IND_PRS_Obj-in-S ;
! @R.CONJ-PX.26@ IND_PRS_Obj-in-S ;
! @R.CONJ-PX.33@ IND_PRS_Obj-in-S ;
! @R.CONJ-PX.36@ IND_PRS_Obj-in-S ;
! @R.CONJ-PX.43@ IND_PRS_Obj-in-S ;
! @R.CONJ-PX.46@ IND_PRS_Obj-in-S ;
! @R.CONJ-PX.53@ IND_PRS_Obj-in-S ;
! @R.CONJ-PX.56@ IND_PRS_Obj-in-S ;
! @R.CONJ-PX.63@ IND_PRS_Obj-in-S ;
! @R.CONJ-PX.66@ IND_PRS_Obj-in-S ;
!@U.CONJ-INF.NO@ PredIndPrt1Sc3 ;


!LEXICON V_NEKSHNEMS_SUB
!+Use/NG+Err/Orth: V_NEKSHNEMS ;
LEXICON V_NEKSHNEMS
:е V_KUNDAMS ;
+Err/Orth-stem-hard-e-should-be-je:э V_KUNDAMS ;
LEXICON V_NEKSHNEMS-CONJUGATION
:е V_KUNDAMS-CONJUGATION ;
+Err/Orth-stem-hard-e-should-be-je:э V_KUNDAMS-CONJUGATION ;

!касомс:ка
LEXICON V_KASOMS
:с V_KADOMS ;
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@+Err/Orth-s-to-j:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@й PredIndPrt1Sc3 ;

!куземс:ку
LEXICON V_KUZEMS
:зь V_LEDEMS ;
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@+Err/Orth-z-to-j:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@й PredIndPrt1Sc3 ;
!LEXICON V_KUZEMS-CONJUGATION
!:зь V_LEDEMS-CONJUGATION ;
!@U.CONJ-INF.NO@!:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@й PredIndPrt1Sc3 ;


LEXICON TV_LEDEMS_errorth
+Err/Orth: TV_KADOMS ;
LEXICON V_LEDEMS
 V_KADOMS ;
LEXICON V_LEDEMS-CONJUGATION
 V_KADOMS-CONJUGATION ;

!LEXICON V_LEDEMS-SG3
! V_KADOMS-SG3 ;

LEXICON V_SAVTOMS
 V_KADOMS ;

LEXICON V_SAVTOMS-CONJUGATION
 V_KADOMS-CONJUGATION ;

LEXICON V_SAVTOMS-SG3
 V_KADOMS-SG3 ;

LEXICON V_CHACHTOMS
 V_KADOMS ;
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@а PredIndPrt1Sc3 ;

!LEXICON V_CHACHTOMS-CONJUGATION
! V_KADOMS-CONJUGATION ;

LEXICON V_NEVTEMS
 V_KADOMS ;
!LEXICON V_NEVTEMS-CONJUGATION
! V_KADOMS-CONJUGATION ;

LEXICON V_KADOMS
 VerbsPresPrc_1 ;
 Deverbals-kadoms ;
 V_KADOMS-CONJUGATION ;
